Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB618.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 243.034 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A limited restaurant license may be issued to an establishment meeting the definition criteria established in
KRS 241.010(37) as long as the establishment is within:
(a) Any wet territory; or
(b) Any moist precinct that has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages under KRS 242.1244.
(2) A limited restaurant license shall authorize the licensee to purchase, receive, possess, and sell alcoholic
beverages at retail by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises or off-premises consumption
pursuant to KRS 243.081. The licensee shall purchase alcoholic beverages only from licensed wholesalers or
distributors, except for purchases made pursuant to subsection (5) of this section. The license shall not
authorize the licensee to sell alcoholic beverages by the package.
(3) The holder of a limited restaurant license shall maintain at least seventy percent (70%) of its gross receipts
from the sale of food and maintain the minimum applicable seating requirement required for the type of
limited restaurant license.
(4) A limited restaurant as defined by KRS 241.010(37)(a) shall:
(a) Only sell alcoholic beverages incidental to the sale of a meal; and
(b) Not have an open bar and shall not sell alcoholic beverages to any person who has not purchased or
does not purchase a meal.
(5) (a) The holder of a limited restaurant license may purchase alcoholic beverages by the package from
licensees authorized to sell distilled spirits, wine, and malt beverages at retail, but only if those
alcoholic beverages have first gone through the three (3) tier system.
(b) Any purchase made pursuant to this subsection shall:
1. Only be sold by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises or off-premises
consumption pursuant to KRS 243.081;
2. Be reported quarterly on a form prescribed by the department; and
3. Include a copy of each receipt of purchase.
(c) The holder of a limited restaurant license shall not purchase at retail more than:
1. Nine (9) liters of distilled spirits per month;
2. Nine (9) liters of wine per month; and
3. Three (3) cases of malt beverages per month.
Section 2. KRS 243.084 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A "Nonquota type 2" or "NQ2" retail drink license may be issued to an applicant operating as, or in:
(a) A hotel that:
1. Contains at least fifty (50) sleeping units; and
2. Receives from its total food and alcoholic beverage sales at least fifty percent (50%) of its gross
receipts from the sale of food;
(b) A restaurant;
(c) An airport;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(d) A riverboat;
(e) A distiller; or
(f) A business located within, or adjacent to, an entertainment destination center licensed premises.
(2) A holder of an NQ2 retail drink license may purchase, receive, possess, and sell alcoholic beverages at retail
by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises or off-premises consumption pursuant to KRS 243.081.
The licensee shall purchase alcoholic beverages only from licensed wholesalers or distributors, except for
purchases made by restaurants pursuant to subsection (4) of this section. A distiller may purchase its own
products for retail drink sales under KRS 243.0305. The holder of an NQ2 retail drink license shall store
alcoholic beverages in the manner prescribed in KRS 244.260.
(3) (a) To qualify for an NQ2 license, a riverboat shall have a regular or alternative place of mooring in a wet
county or city of this state.
(b) If a riverboat moors or makes landfall in a location other than its regular or alternate regular place of
mooring, all alcoholic beverages shall be kept locked.
(c) A riverboat licensed under this subsection shall not take on or discharge passengers when mooring or
making landfall in dry option territory.
(4) (a) A holder of an NQ2 retail drink license operating as a restaurant may purchase alcoholic beverages
by the package from licensees authorized to sell distilled spirits, wine, and malt beverages at retail,
but only if those alcoholic beverages have first gone through the three (3) tier system.
(b) Any purchase made pursuant to this subsection shall:
1. Only be sold by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises or off-premises
consumption pursuant to KRS 243.081;
2. Be reported quarterly on a form prescribed by the department; and
3. Include a copy of each receipt of purchase.
(c) A holder of an NQ2 retail drink license shall not purchase at retail more than:
1. Nine (9) liters of distilled spirits per month;
2. Nine (9) liters of wine per month; and
3. Three (3) cases of malt beverages per month.
Section 3. KRS 243.088 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A "Nonquota type 4" or "NQ4" retail malt beverage drink license may be issued to the holder of a quota retail
drink license, microbrewery license, small farm winery license, or any other business wishing to sell malt
beverages by the drink for consumption on the premises only.
(2) An NQ4 retail malt beverage drink license shall authorize the licensee to:
(a) Sell malt beverages at retail by the drink from only the licensed premises for consumption at the
licensed premises only; and
(b) Purchase malt beverages only from a distributor, except for purchases made pursuant to subsection (5)
of this section.
(3) The holder of an NQ4 retail malt beverage drink license may also hold a nonquota retail malt beverage
package license.
(4) A nonquota retail malt beverage drink license shall not be issued to any premises from which gasoline and
lubricating oil are sold or from which the servicing and repair of motor vehicles is conducted, unless there is
maintained in inventory on the premises for sale at retail not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) of food,
groceries, and related products valued at cost. For purposes of this subsection, the term "food and groceries"
has the meaning provided in KRS 243.280. This section shall not apply to any licensed premises that sells no
fuel other than marine fuel.
(5) (a) The holder of an NQ4 retail malt beverage drink license may purchase malt beverages by the
package from licensees authorized to sell malt beverages at retail, but only if those malt beverages
have first gone through the three (3) tier system.

CHAPTER 130 3
(b) Any purchase made pursuant to this subsection shall:
1. Only be sold by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises;
2. Be reported quarterly on a form prescribed by the department; and
3. Include a copy of each receipt of purchase.
(c) The holder of an NQ4 retail malt beverage drink license shall not purchase at retail more than three
(3) cases of malt beverages per month.
Section 4. KRS 243.250 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A quota retail drink license shall authorize the licensee to purchase, receive, possess, and sell distilled spirits
and wine at retail by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises, or off-premises consumption
pursuant to KRS 243.081. The licensee shall purchase distilled spirits and wine only from licensed
wholesalers, except for purchases made pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
(2) (a) The holder of a quota retail drink license may purchase distilled spirits and wine by the package from
licensees authorized to sell distilled spirits and wine at retail, but only if those distilled spirits and
wine have first gone through the three (3) tier system.
(b) Any purchase made pursuant to this subsection shall:
1. Only be sold by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises or off-premises
consumption pursuant to KRS 243.081;
2. Be reported quarterly on a form prescribed by the department; and
3. Include a copy of each receipt of purchase.
(c) The holder of a quota retail drink license shall not purchase at retail more than:
1. Nine (9) liters of distilled spirits per month; and
2. Nine (9) liters of wine per month.
Section 5. KRS 243.036 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license may be issued to an auctioneer licensed under KRS
Chapter 330 or to a charitable or nonprofit organization.
(2) A special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license issued to a charitable or nonprofit organization shall
authorize the holder to:
(a) Purchase, transport, receive, possess, store, sell, and deliver alcoholic beverages to be sold by auction or
raffle or consumed at charity or nonprofit events;
(b) Purchase, transport, receive, possess, store, sell, and deliver limited specially labeled bottles of
alcoholic beverages to be sold at charity or nonprofit events;
(c) Obtain alcoholic beverages from distillers, rectifiers, wineries, small farm wineries, brewers,
microbreweries, wholesalers, distributors, retailers, or any other person, by gift or donation, for the
purpose of charity or nonprofit events; and
(d) Receive payment for alcoholic beverages sold at events.
(3) For a charitable or nonprofit auction:
(a) Each alcoholic beverage auction or raffle conducted by a charitable organization shall be subject to all
restrictions and limitations contained in KRS Chapters 241 to 244 and the administrative regulations
issued under those chapters and shall be authorized only on the days and only during the hours that the
sale of alcoholic beverages is otherwise authorized in the county or municipality; and[.]
(b)[(4)] The location at which the alcoholic beverages are auctioned, raffled, or consumed under this
section shall not constitute a public place for the purpose of KRS Chapter 222. Charitable or nonprofit
events may be conducted on licensed or unlicensed premises. The charitable organization possessing a
special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license shall post a copy of the license at the location of
the event.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(4) An auctioneer holding a special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license may:
(a) Transport, receive, possess, store, advertise, auction, sell, deliver, and ship alcoholic beverages either
sold or intended for sale at auction by the licensee;
(b) Sell only alcoholic beverages at auction that:
1. Were previously lawfully sold at retail; and
2. Are in their original manufacturer's unopened container;
(c) Deliver and ship any alcoholic beverages sold at an auction directly to the consumer who purchased
the alcoholic beverages. Any shipment to a consumer outside of this state is subject to all applicable
laws of the jurisdiction in which that consumer is located. When shipping alcoholic beverages
directly to a consumer in this state, the auctioneer holder of the license shall:
1. Ensure that the shipping label on each container containing the alcoholic beverages
conspicuously states the following: "CONTAINS ALCOHOL: SIGNATURE OF PERSON
AGE 21 OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY";
2. Obtain the signature of a person who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age at the delivery
address prior to delivery, after requiring that person to demonstrate that he or she is at least
twenty-one (21) years of age by providing a valid identification document; and
3. Not ship the alcoholic beverages to any address in this state located in dry territory; and
(d) Conduct the auction on premises licensed by the department, unlicensed premises, or online.
(5) A special temporary alcoholic beverage auction conducted by an auctioneer shall be:
(a) Subject to all restrictions and limitations contained in KRS Chapters 241 to 244 and the
administrative regulations issued under those chapters;
(b) Separate from any other type of alcoholic beverage auction authorized under KRS Chapters 241 to
244, but may be combined with other types of auctions authorized under KRS Chapter 330;
(c) Authorized for in-person live auctions and online auction closings only on the days and only during
the hours that the sale of alcoholic beverages is otherwise authorized in the county or municipality
where the live auction is held or, for an online auction, the physical location of the alcoholic
beverages being sold; and
(d) Subject to the auction and auctioneer requirements of KRS Chapter 330.
(6) An auctioneer conducting a special temporary alcoholic beverage auction shall:
(a) Post a copy of its special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license and auctioneer license at the
location of the event for in-person auctions and on the auction website for online auctions; and
(b) Not hold any other type of alcoholic beverage license.
(7) Alcoholic beverages shall only be sold by an auctioneer under a special temporary alcoholic beverage
auction license if the alcoholic beverages were not purchased or attained for the purpose of resale at
auction and in the following circumstances:
(a) As an "Estate Auction," or included in such auction where the alcoholic beverages being offered at
auction are the property belonging to the estate of one (1) or more deceased persons and are being
offered by:
1. The direction and authority of the authorized executor or administrator;
2. Court order; or
3. The direction or on behalf of a surviving spouse or direct heirs;
(b) As a "Living Estate Auction" or "Downsizing Auction" or included in such auction where the
alcoholic beverages being offered at auction are the property belonging to a person or persons of a
household that is in transition due to one (1) of the following life-changing situations:
1. One (1) or more members of the household moving into a retirement home, nursing home,
assisted living home, or a smaller residence; or

CHAPTER 130 5
2. Combining one (1) household with another; or
(c) As a partial or complete disbursement of an alcoholic beverage collection consisting of more than
one (1) package that has been collected by the same individual or household. An individual or
household shall not sell collections at auction more than once every three (3) years.
(8) (a) A person shall not purchase alcoholic beverages from an auctioneer at a special temporary alcoholic
beverage auction unless that person may lawfully receive or possess the alcoholic beverages.
(b) Nothing in this section shall prevent a vintage distilled spirits licensee from purchasing alcoholic
beverages at auction if the alcoholic beverages qualify as vintage distilled spirits.
(9) All advertising for an auctioneer special temporary alcoholic beverage auction shall:
(a) Show the name and license number for the special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license and
the auctioneer license; and
(b) Conform to all advertising requirements and restrictions for auctions contained in KRS Chapter 330
and any administrative regulations promulgated under that chapter.
(10) If a person ceases to be licensed as an auctioneer under KRS Chapter 330, the person's special temporary
alcoholic beverage auction license shall be automatically suspended until the person reestablishes licensure
as an auctioneer.
(11) An auctioneer holding a special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license shall file a quarterly report
with the department, which shall be established and maintained by the department, utilizing a form
prescribed by the department that includes the following information:
(a) The number of alcoholic beverage packages auctioned in the preceding three (3) months in total,
with each purchase matched to the individuals who both sold and purchased the alcoholic beverages;
(b) The date of each purchase;
(c) The name, address, and phone number of each individual who sold and purchased the alcoholic
beverages;
(d) A detailed description of the alcoholic beverages purchased, including the brand name, number of
packages, and the size of the packages; and
(e) Whether each alcoholic beverage package was purchased in-person, delivered in-person, or shipped.
(12) A special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license shall not be issued for any period longer than thirty
(30) days.
(13)[(6)] Notwithstanding any other provision of KRS Chapters 241 to 244, a distiller, rectifier, winery, small
farm winery, brewer, microbrewery, wholesaler, distributor, or retailer may donate, give away, or deliver any
of its products to a charitable or nonprofit organization possessing a special temporary alcoholic beverage
auction license under this section.
(14)[(7)] All restrictions and prohibitions applying to an alcoholic beverage retail package and alcoholic
beverage by the drink license, not inconsistent with this section, shall apply to a special temporary alcoholic
beverage auction license.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 330 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An auctioneer licensed under this chapter may obtain a special temporary alcoholic beverage auction
license from the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control. A special temporary alcoholic beverage
auction license shall allow the auctioneer to auction alcoholic beverages as authorized in Section 5 of this
Act.
(2) An auctioneer who receives a suspension or revocation from the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control
for a violation relating to a special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license may be subject to
additional discipline by the board under this chapter.
(3) The Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall have no authority to take any action relating to an
auctioneer's license issued under this chapter.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(4) An auctioneer may auction alcoholic beverages as a separate auction or in the same auction with other
types of real property, personal property, or any combination thereof.
Section 7. KRS 243.033 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A caterer's license may be issued as a supplementary license to a caterer that holds a quota retail package
license, a quota retail drink license, an NQ1 license, an NQ2 license, or a limited restaurant license.
(2) The caterer's license may be issued as a primary license to a caterer in any wet territory or in any moist
territory under KRS 242.1244 for the premises that serves as the caterer's commissary and designated banquet
hall. No primary caterer's license shall authorize alcoholic beverage sales at a premises that operates as a
restaurant. The alcoholic beverage stock of the caterer shall be kept under lock and key at the licensed
premises during the time that the alcoholic beverages are not being used in conjunction with a catered
function.
(3) The caterer's license shall authorize the caterer to:
(a) Purchase and store alcoholic beverages in the manner prescribed in KRS 243.088, 243.250, and
244.260;
(b) Transport, sell, serve, and deliver alcoholic beverages by the drink at locations away from the licensed
premises or at the caterer's designated banquet hall in conjunction with the catering of food and
alcoholic beverages for a customer and the customer's guests, in:
1. Cities and counties established as moist territory under KRS 242.1244 if the receipts from the
catering of food at any catered event are at least seventy percent (70%) of the gross receipts from
the catering of both food and alcoholic beverages;
2. Precincts established as moist territory if the receipts from the catering of food at any catered
event are at least ten percent (10%) of the gross receipts from the catering of both food and
alcoholic beverages. This subparagraph shall supersede any conflicting provisions of KRS
Chapters 241 to 244;
3. Wet cities and counties in which quota retail drink licenses are not available if the receipts from
the catering of food at any catered event are at least fifty percent (50%) of the gross receipts from
the catering of both food and alcoholic beverages; or
4. All other wet territory if the receipts from the catering of food at any catered event are at least
thirty-five percent (35%) of the gross receipts from the catering of both food and alcoholic
beverages;
(c) Receive and fill telephone orders for alcoholic beverages in conjunction with the ordering of food for a
catered event; and
(d) Receive payment for alcoholic beverages served at a catered event on a by-the-drink, cash bar, or by-
the-event basis. The caterer may bill the customer for by-the-function sales of alcoholic beverages in
the usual course of the caterer's business.
(4) A caterer licensee shall not cater alcoholic beverages at locations for which retail alcoholic beverage licenses
or special temporary licenses have been issued. A caterer licensee may cater a charitable or nonprofit
fundraising event for which a special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license has been issued under KRS
243.036.
(5) A caterer licensee shall not cater alcoholic beverages on Sunday except in territory in which the Sunday sale of
alcoholic beverages is permitted under the provisions of KRS 244.290 and 244.480.
(6) The location at which alcoholic beverages are sold, served, and delivered by a caterer, pursuant to this section,
shall not constitute a public place for the purpose of KRS Chapter 222. If the location is a multi-unit structure,
only the unit or units at which the function being catered is held shall be excluded from the public place
provisions of KRS Chapter 222.
(7) The caterer licensee shall post a copy of the licensee's caterer's license at the location of the function for which
alcoholic beverages are catered.
(8) All restrictions and prohibitions applying to a quota retail drink licensee and an NQ4 retail malt beverage drink
licensee not inconsistent with this section shall apply to the caterer licensee.

CHAPTER 130 7
(9) The caterer licensee shall maintain records as set forth in KRS 244.150 and in administrative regulations
promulgated by the board.
(10) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(b) of this section, a caterer may serve alcoholic beverages to guests who are
twenty-one (21) years of age or older at a private event in dry territory if:
(a) The alcoholic beverages were lawfully purchased in a wet or moist territory:
1. By an individual; or
2. At the caterer's licensed premises in wet or moist territory; and
(b) The alcoholic beverages are not sold in dry territory to guests at the private residence or private event
regardless of whether the venue is a public place.
Section 8. KRS 243.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, each kind of license listed in KRS 243.030 shall be
incompatible with every other kind listed in that section and no person or entity holding a license of any of
those kinds shall apply for or hold a license of another kind listed in KRS 243.030.
(2) (a) Each kind of license listed in KRS 243.040(1), (3), or (4) shall be incompatible with every other kind
listed in KRS 243.040(1), (3), or (4), and no person holding a license of any of those kinds shall apply
for or hold a license of any other kind listed in KRS 243.040(1), (3), or (4).
(b) A brewery holding a license listed in KRS 243.040(5) or (8) shall not apply for or hold a license listed
in KRS 243.040(3) or (4).
(3) (a) The holder of a quota retail package license may also hold a quota retail drink license, an NQ1 retail
drink license, an NQ2 retail drink license, an NQ3 retail drink license, or a special nonbeverage alcohol
license.
(b) The holder of a transporter's license may also hold a distilled spirits and wine storage license.
(c) The holder of a distiller's license may also hold a rectifier's license, a special nonbeverage alcohol
license, a winery license, or a small farm winery license.
(d) A commercial airline system or charter flight system retail license, a commercial airline system or
charter flight system transporter's license, and a retail drink license if held by a commercial airline or
charter flight system may be held by the same licensee.
(e) A Sunday retail drink license, vintage distilled spirits license, and supplemental license may be held by
the holder of a primary license.
(f) The holder of a distiller's, winery, small farm winery, brewer, microbrewery, distilled spirits and wine
supplier's, or malt beverage supplier's license may also hold a direct shipper license.
(g) The holder of an NQ1 retail drink license, an NQ2 retail drink license, an NQ3 retail drink license, a
quota retail drink license, or a limited restaurant license may also hold a limited nonquota package
license.
(4) Any person may hold two (2) or more licenses of the same kind.
(5) A person or entity shall not evade the prohibition against applying for or holding licenses of two (2) kinds by
applying for a second license through or under the name of a different person or entity. The state administrator
shall examine the ownership, membership, and management of applicants, and shall deny the application for a
license if the applicant is substantially interested in a person or entity that holds an incompatible license.
Section 9. KRS 243.238 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A limited nonquota package license may be issued as a supplementary license to a licensee that holds an NQ1
retail drink license, an NQ2 retail drink license, an NQ3 retail drink license, a quota retail drink license, or a
limited restaurant license in a jurisdiction that has authorized the sale of distilled spirits and wine by the
package.
(2) The limited nonquota package license shall authorize the licensee to:
(a) Purchase private selection packages in the original manufacturer's unopened containers; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) Sell private selection packages at retail in the original manufacturer's unopened containers, and only for
consumption off the licensed premises.
(3) The licensee shall purchase private selection packages in accordance with KRS 243.0305(4).
Signed by Governor March 31, 2025.